District of Columbia statutes.
46-414

Record books.

The Clerk of the said Court shall provide a record book in his office, consisting of applications and licenses in blank, to be filled up by him with the names and residences of the parties for whose marriage any license may have been issued, said applications and licenses to be numbered consecutively from 1 upward, and also a record book in which shall be recorded, in the order of their numbers, the certificates of the minister or other persons authorized, upon their return to said office, corresponding to said record book of licenses issued, and a copy of any license and certificate of marriage so kept and recorded, certified by the Clerk under his hand and seal, shall be competent evidence of the marriage.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1393, ch. 854, § 1295
False or fictitious transcript of any record of marriage, penalties, see §§ 7-220, 7-225.
Fees for copies of record, see § 1-301.01.
1981 Ed., § 30-114.
1973 Ed., § 30-114.